Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-102
Military code; contents.

All acts of the Congress of the United States providing for the administration, control, equipment, government, and organization of the armed forces of the United States, together with the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder, now in effect and hereinafter enacted or promulgated may, by appropriate rules and regulations, be adopted by the Governor for the operation and regulation of the military forces and militia of the state insofar as the same are not inconsistent with rights reserved to this state under the constitution of the state and provisions of this code.

Laws 1929, c. 189, § 55, p. 673;

C.S.1929, § 55-174;

R.S.1943, § 55-102;

Laws 1953, c. 188, § 1, p. 592.

"This code", see section 55-101.